Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4666.
People of the State of Michigan enact: Sec. 2082. (1) A life insurer doing business in this state shall not make any distinction or discrimination between individuals based on race or color as to the premiums or rates charged for policies on the lives of those individuals, or in any other manner. A life insurer doing business in this state shall not demand or require a greater premium from an individual based on that individuals race or color. A life insurer doing business in this state shall not make or require a rebate, diminution, or discount on the amount to be paid on a life insurance policy based on an individuals race or color or insert in the policy a condition, or make a stipulation by which the insured individual binds the individual or the individuals heirs, personal representatives, and assigns to accept an amount less than the full amount or value of the policy for a claim accruing because of the death of the insured individual, based on the individuals race or color, and any such stipulation or condition so made or inserted is void. (2) An insurer that violates this section is subject to a civil fine of $1,000.00 for each violation, to be recovered by the attorney general by appropriate action in a court, and a judgment from the action may be collected in the same manner as is provided for collecting judgments rendered in favor of policyholders. An officer or agent who violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than 1 year, a fine of not less than $500.00 and not more than $1,000.00, or both. Clerk of the House of Representatives Secretary of the Senate Approved___________________________________________ ____________________________________________________ Governor